District of Columbia statutes.
38-2973.05

Audit of capital improvement projects.

No later than June 1, 2007, and each year thereafter until the completion of all projects designated in the Facilities Master Plan, the District of Columbia Auditor shall prepare an annual report to the public on the use of the capital funds by the District of Columbia Public Schools during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include a school- and project-specific audit of all expenditures for school facility capital improvements, maintenance, repairs, and operating costs and an assessment of whether the District has met the process, quality, schedule, and cost objectives of the Facilities Master Plan and Capital Improvement Plan and Budget.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 205, 53 DCR 2843